Utah statutes.
31A-22-1414.   Marketing.

A policy or rider shall comply with this part if it is advertised, marketed, or offered as:

(1)  long-term care insurance; or

(2)  nursing home insurance.



Enacted by Chapter 116, 2001 General Session

